Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.08.180

Reports of resources and liabilities.

Every bank shall make at least three regular reports each year to the director, as of the dates which he or she shall designate, according to form prescribed by him or her, verified by the president, manager or cashier and attested by at least two directors, which shall exhibit under appropriate heads the resources and liabilities of such corporation. The dates designated by the director shall be the dates designated by the comptroller of the currency of the United States for reports of national banking associations.

Every such corporation shall also make such special reports as the director shall call for.

[ 2014 c 37 s 168; 1995 c 344 s 3; 1994 c 92 s 60; 1955 c 33 s 30.08.180. Prior: 1919 c 209 s 4; 1917 c 80 s 5; RRS s 3212. Formerly RCW 30.08.180.]